Washington statutes.
RCW 35.56.280

Reassessments.

If any assessment is found to be invalid for any cause or if it is set aside for any reason in judicial proceeding, a reassessment may be made and all laws then in force relative to the reassessment of local assessments, for street or other improvements, shall, as far as practical, be applicable hereto.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.56.280. Prior: 1913 c 16 s 16; RRS s 9464.]

NOTES:

Local improvements, assessments and reassessments: Chapter 35.44 RCW.